test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_vahe_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - iše: # ok VAHE
    iše+N+Sg+Nom:  iˊṣ̌e
    iše+N+Sg+Gen:  iˊše
    iše+N+Sg+Acc: iˊše
    iše+N+Sg+Ill:  iˊṣ̌án
    iše+N+Sg+Loc:  iššeest
    iše+N+Sg+Com:  iššijn # MM
    iše+N+Sg+Abe:  iˊšettáá
    iše+N+Ess:  iššeen
    iše+N+Par: iššeed
    iše+N+Pl+Nom:  iˊšeh
    iše+N+Pl+Gen: [iišij, iˊšij]
    iše+N+Pl+Acc:  iišijd
    iše+N+Pl+Ill:  [iišijd, iiṣ̌ijd, iššijd] # MM iišijd iiṣ̌ijd hardcoded
    iše+N+Pl+Loc:  iišijn
    iše+N+Pl+Com:  iˊšijguin
    iše+N+Pl+Abe:  iˊšijttáá

  Noun - vahe: # ok VAHE
    vahe+N+Sg+Nom: vaˊhe
    vahe+N+Sg+Gen: vaˊṿe
    vahe+N+Sg+Acc: vaˊṿe
    vahe+N+Sg+Ill: vaˊhan
    vahe+N+Sg+Loc: vavveest
    vahe+N+Sg+Com: vovvijn
    vahe+N+Sg+Abe: vaˊṿettáá
    vahe+N+Ess: vahheen
    vahe+N+Par: vahheed
    vahe+N+Pl+Nom: vaˊṿeh
    vahe+N+Pl+Gen: [vooṿij, voˊṿij]
    vahe+N+Pl+Acc: vooṿijd
    vahe+N+Pl+Ill: vovvijd
    vahe+N+Pl+Loc: vooṿijn
    vahe+N+Pl+Com: voˊṿijguin
    vahe+N+Pl+Abe: voˊṿijttáá

  Noun - ahe: # ok VAHE
    ahe+N+Sg+Nom:  aˊhe
    ahe+N+Sg+Gen:  aˊṿe
    ahe+N+Sg+Acc:  aˊṿe
    ahe+N+Sg+Ill:  aˊhan
    ahe+N+Sg+Loc:  avveest
    ahe+N+Sg+Com:  ovvijn
    ahe+N+Sg+Abe:  aˊṿettáá
    ahe+N+Ess:  ahheen
    ahe+N+Par: ahheed
    ahe+N+Pl+Nom:  aˊṿeh
    ahe+N+Pl+Gen: [ooṿij, oˊṿij]
    ahe+N+Pl+Acc:  ooṿijd
    ahe+N+Pl+Ill:  ovvijd
    ahe+N+Pl+Loc:  ooṿijn
    ahe+N+Pl+Com:  oˊṿijguin
    ahe+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊṿijttáá

  Noun - njihe: # ok VAHE
    njihe+N+Sg+Nom:  njiˊhe
    njihe+N+Sg+Gen:  njiˊṿe
    njihe+N+Sg+Acc:  njiˊṿe
    njihe+N+Sg+Ill:  njiˊhán
    njihe+N+Sg+Loc:  njivveest
    njihe+N+Sg+Com:  njivvijn
    njihe+N+Sg+Abe:  njiˊṿettáá
    njihe+N+Ess:  njihheen
    njihe+N+Par:  njihheed
    njihe+N+Pl+Nom:  njiˊṿeh
    njihe+N+Pl+Gen:  [njiiṿij, njiˊṿij]
    njihe+N+Pl+Acc:  njiiṿijd
    njihe+N+Pl+Ill:  njivvijd
    njihe+N+Pl+Loc:  njiiṿijn
    njihe+N+Pl+Com:  njiˊṿijguin
    njihe+N+Pl+Abe:  njiˊṿijttáá
    
